Maryland, session 2025, HB0282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–136.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SEXUALLY EXPLICIT MATERIALS” MEANS BOOKS AND
AUDITORY AND VISUAL MATERIALS THAT CONTAIN GRAPHIC OR OBSCENE
DEPICTIONS OF SEXUAL ACTIVITY THAT ARE NOT:
(1) AGE–APPROPRIATE; OR
(2) USED AS PART OF THE APPROVED INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS
FOR INSTRUCTION ON FAMILY LIFE AND HUMAN SEXUALITY AS PART OF THE
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0282*

HOUSE BILL 282
COMPREHENSIVE HEALTH EDUCATION PROGRAM REQUIRED UNDER THE
MARYLAND HEALTH EDUCATION STANDARDS.
(B) A PUBLIC ELEMENTARY, MIDDLE, OR SECONDARY SCHOOL LIBRARY OR
MEDIA CENTER MAY NOT CONTAIN SEXUALLY EXPLICIT MATERIALS.
(C) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL ADOPT POLICIES AND PROCEDURES TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.